Louisiana, session 2026, HB448.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:1681.2(A) and (C) and 1682.2(A) and (C) are hereby amended
and reenacted to read as follows:
§1681.2. Scholarships for spouses of police officers killed or disabled in
performance of duty and for police officers injured in the performance of
duty
A. The spouse of a police officer who is injured in the course and scope of
the performance of his duties and the injury causes death or serious injury resulting
in an inability to be employed, which spouse is otherwise eligible and meets all of
the entrance requirements of a college or university, shall be admitted to a college
or university without the payment of any fees, tuition, or other charges, including
room and board charges. As long as the spouse meets the academic requirements and
maintains a "C" average for each semester and complies with the rules and
regulations of the college or university required for attendance, as a full-time student,
the spouse shall receive the exemption. The Such exemption shall exist for the
spouse for the number of semesters required of a full-time student to obtain one
bachelor to obtain one bachelor's, master's, doctoral, or other postgraduate degree
offered by the college or university. In addition, the spouse shall be entitled to a cash
grant of two hundred fifty dollars per semester from the college or university as an
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 448 ENROLLED
allowance for books, and all of the above sums shall be paid out of funds
appropriated from the general fund of the state of Louisiana.
* * *
C. Any police officer who is injured in the performance of duties as a police
officer and such injury results in an inability to be employed, and the police officer
is otherwise eligible and meets all of the entrance requirements of a college or
university, such police officer shall be admitted to such college or university without
the payment of any fees, tuition, or other charges, including room and board charges,
as long as such police officer meets the academic requirements and maintains a "C"
average for each semester and complies with the rules and regulations of such
college or university required for attendance therein as a full-time student. Such
exemption shall exist for such police officer for the number of semesters required of
a full-time student to obtain one bachelor to obtain one bachelor's, master's, doctoral,
or other postgraduate degree offered by such college or university. In addition
thereto, such police officer shall be entitled to a cash grant of two hundred fifty
dollars per semester from such college or university as an allowance for books, and
all of the above sums shall be paid out of funds appropriated from the general fund
of the state of Louisiana.
* * *
§1682.2. Scholarships for spouses of firefighters killed or disabled in performance
of duty; scholarships for disabled firefighters
A. The spouse of a firefighter who is injured in the course and scope of the
performance of his duties and the injury causes death or serious injury resulting in
an inability to be employed, which spouse is otherwise eligible and meets all of the
entrance requirements of a college or university, shall be admitted to such college
or university without the payment of any fees, tuition, or other charges, including
room and board charges. As long as such spouse meets the academic requirements
and maintains a "C" average for each semester and complies with the rules and
regulations of such college or university required for attendance therein as a full-time
student such spouse shall receive the exemption. Such exemption shall exist for such
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 448 ENROLLED
spouse for the number of semesters required of a full-time student to obtain one
bachelor to obtain one bachelor's, master's, doctoral, or other postgraduate degree
offered by such college or university. In addition thereto, such spouse shall be
entitled to a cash grant of two hundred fifty dollars per semester from such college
or university as an allowance for books and all of the above sums shall be paid out
of funds appropriated from the general fund of the state of Louisiana.
* * *
C. Any firefighter who is injured in the performance of duties as a firefighter
and such injury results in an inability to be employed, and the firefighter is otherwise
eligible and meets all of the entrance requirements of a college or university, such
firefighter shall be admitted to such college or university without the payment of any
fees, tuition, or other charges, including room and board charges, as long as such
firefighter meets the academic requirements and maintains a "C" average for each
semester and complies with the rules and regulations of such college or university
required for attendance therein as a full-time student. Such exemption shall exist for
such firefighter for the number of semesters required of a full-time student to obtain
one bachelor to obtain one bachelor's, master's, doctoral, or other postgraduate
degree offered by such college or university. In addition thereto, such firefighter
shall be entitled to a cash grant of two hundred fifty dollars per semester from such
college or university as an allowance for books and all of the above sums shall be
paid out of funds appropriated from the general fund of the state of Louisiana.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.